District of Columbia statutes.
38-352

Qualifications.

The Ombudsman shall:

(1)

Be appointed without regard to party affiliation;

(2)

Be appointed on the basis of integrity;

(3)

Possess a demonstrated ability to analyze issues and matters of law, administration, and policy;

(4)

Possess experience in the field of social work, counseling, mediation, law, policy, or public administration or auditing, accounting, or other investigative field; and

(5)

Have management experience that demonstrates an ability to hire and supervise qualified staff.

History

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 603, 54 DCR 4102